Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB846.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 160 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to other methods of removal as provided in Section 2 of this Act, a
superintendent of a school district shall be subject to recall from office.
(2) (a) Any ten (10) registered and qualified voters who reside in the school district
may commence petition proceedings to recall the superintendent of a school
district by filing a superintendent recall affidavit with the county clerk of
the county in which the school district is located.
(b) The ten (10) registered and qualified voters who reside in the school district
and have signed the superintendent recall affidavit shall constitute the
membership of the petition committee.
(c) The petition committee shall be responsible for:
1. Circulating the superintendent recall petition; and
2. Properly filing the petition for a superintendent recall election with
the county clerk.
(3) A superintendent recall affidavit shall state:
(a) The names and addresses of the membership of the petition committee;
(b) The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
(c) For petition committees filing petitions to recall the superintendent of a
school district that is primarily located in a county containing an urban-
county government or a consolidated local government, whether the petition
committee is willing to incur all of the expenses associated with electronic
petition signatures. If the petition committee is not willing to incur all the
expenses, then electronic petition signatures shall not be allowed for the
petition.
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
(4) A superintendent recall affidavit shall not be filed:
(a) Within ninety (90) days of the initial appointment of the superintendent; or
(b) Less than one hundred and eighty (180) days prior to the regular election
the recall question would appear on the ballot.
(5) Upon receipt of a superintendent recall affidavit filed in accordance with this
section, the county clerk shall immediately notify the petition committee:
(a) Of all statutory requirements for the filing of a valid superintendent recall
petition under this section; and
(b) That the clerk will publish a notice of the superintendent recall petition and
provide the names and addresses of the petition committee in a newspaper
of general circulation within the county, if:
1. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the notice;
2. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of
publishing the notice determined in accordance with KRS 424.160 at
the time of the filing of the superintendent recall affidavit. If the
petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk shall
publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of the superintendent
recall affidavit; and
3. A copy of the superintendent recall affidavit is delivered to the
superintendent and the local board of education.
(6) (a) A superintendent recall petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and
style and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more
than one (1) voting precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or
indelible pencil;
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements
of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, birth month, and birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. The petition shall be signed by at least five thousand (5,000)
registered and qualified voters residing in the affected school
district or signed by a number of registered and qualified voters
residing in the affected school district equal to at least ten
percent (10%) of the total number of votes cast in the last
preceding presidential election, whichever is less.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining
whether the required number of petition signatures have been
obtained when the:
i. Expenses associated with the electronic petition signatures
have been incurred in accordance with subsection (3)(c) of
this section;
ii. Electronic petition signatures comply with the
requirements of this subsection; and
iii. Petition was filed to recall a superintendent of a school
district that is primarily located in a county containing an
urban-county government or a consolidated local
government.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not
invalidate the entire page of the petition, but shall instead result
in the invalid petition signature being stricken and not counted.
(b) The county clerk shall immediately notify the local board of education and
the superintendent that the superintendent recall petition has been received
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
and make a determination within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the
petition of whether the petition contains enough signatures of registered
and qualified voters to place the question of recall of the superintendent
before the voters.
(c) If the county clerk finds the superintendent recall petition to be sufficient,
the clerk shall certify to the petition committee, the superintendent, and the
local board of education within the thirty (30) day period provided for in
paragraph (b) of this subsection that the petition is properly presented and
in compliance with the provisions of this section, and that the question of
recall of the superintendent will be placed before the voters.
(d) If the county clerk finds the superintendent recall petition to be insufficient,
the clerk shall, within the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, notify, in writing, the petition committee, the
superintendent, and the local board of education of the specific deficiencies
found. Notification shall be sent by certified mail and shall be published at
least one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation within the county
containing the school district. If there is not a newspaper within the county
in which to publish the notification, the notification shall be posted at the
courthouse door.
(e) A final determination of the sufficiency of a superintendent recall petition
shall be subject to final review by the Circuit Court of the county in which
the school district is located and shall be limited to the validity of the county
clerk's determination. An action challenging the county clerk's final
determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the issuance of the
clerk's final determination.
(f) The superintendent may cause the cancellation of the superintendent recall
election by resigning from the position of superintendent within fifteen (15)
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
days following the date the clerk finds the superintendent recall petition to
be sufficient. A local board of education shall not be permitted to provide
any post-employment compensation or benefits to a superintendent that
resigns during pending superintendent recall petition proceedings,
including but not limited to any severance benefits.
(7) (a) If an election is necessary under subsection (6) of this section, the local
board of education shall cause to be submitted to the voters of the district in
a called common school election not less than thirty-five (35) days nor more
than forty-five (45) days from the date the signatures on the petition are
validated by the county clerk, or at the next regular election, at the option of
the district board of education, the question as to whether the
superintendent of the school district shall be recalled. The cost of a called
common school election shall be borne by the school district holding the
election. Any called common school election shall comply with the
provisions of KRS 118.025.
(b) If an election under paragraph (a) of this subsection is held in conjunction
with a regular election, the question as to whether the superintendent shall
be recalled shall be submitted to the county clerk no later than the second
Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.
(c) In an election held under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the question
shall be framed to ask whether the voter is for recalling the superintendent.
If a majority of the votes cast upon the question favor the recall, the recall
of the superintendent shall become effective.
(d) Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial
terms, for or against any public question that appears on the ballot in this
subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "local" means any city, county,
urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
government, charter county, or special district.
(8) The forms required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be provided
by the State Board of Elections by administrative regulation promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
Section 2. KRS 160.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) After considering the recommendations of a screening committee, as provided in
KRS 160.352, each board of education shall appoint a superintendent of schools
whose term of office shall begin on July 1, following the individual's appointment.
The appointment may be for a term of no more than four (4) years. In the event a
vacancy occurs in the office of superintendent prior to the expiration of the term set
by the board, the term shall expire on the date the vacancy occurs. Therefore, the
board may appoint a superintendent for a new term as provided in this subsection,
which shall begin on the date of the superintendent's appointment, except when the
vacancy occurs after a school board election and before the newly elected members
take office. When a vacancy occurs during this period, the position shall not be
filled until the new members take office, but the board may appoint an acting
superintendent to serve a term not to exceed six (6) months. This appointment may
be renewed once for a period not to exceed three (3) months. If a vacancy occurs, a
local board may also appoint an acting superintendent during the period the
screening committee pursuant to KRS 160.352 conducts its business and prior to
the actual appointment of the new superintendent. No superintendent shall resign
during a term and accept a new term from the same board of education prior to the
expiration date of the present term. In the case of a vacancy in the office for an
unexpired term, the board of education shall make the appointment so that the term
will end on June 30. The board shall set the salary of the superintendent to be paid
in regular installments.
(2) An individual shall not assume the duties of superintendent in a district until he or
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
she provides the board of education with a copy of a certificate for school
superintendent issued by the Education Professional Standards Board or its legal
predecessor. A superintendent shall hold a valid certificate throughout the period of
employment. A superintendent shall successfully complete the training program and
assessment center process within two (2) years of assuming the duties of
superintendent. A superintendent shall not serve as director or officer of a bank,
trust company, or savings or loan association that has the school district's funds on
deposit. Following appointment, the superintendent shall establish residency in
Kentucky.
(3) A superintendent of schools may be removed for cause by a vote of four-fifths (4/5)
of the membership of a board of education and upon approval by the commissioner
of education. However, if the dismissal of the superintendent has been
recommended by a highly skilled certified educator pursuant to KRS 158.6455 and
the action is approved by the commissioner of education, the board shall terminate
the superintendent's contract. Written notice setting out the charges for removal
shall be spread on the minutes of the board and given to the superintendent. The
board shall seek approval by the commissioner of education for removing the
superintendent. The commissioner of education shall investigate the accuracy of the
charges made, evaluate the superintendent's overall performance during the
superintendent's appointment, and consider the educational performance of the
students in the district. Within thirty (30) days of notification, the commissioner of
education shall either approve or reject the board's request.
(4) A superintendent of schools may be recalled from his or her position by the voters
of the school district pursuant to Section 1 of this Act.
(5) After the completion of a superintendent's first contract or after four (4) years,
whichever comes last, the board of education may, no later than June 30, extend the
contract of the superintendent for one (1) additional year beyond the current term of
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 936
employment.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:10 PM Jacketed